Utah statutes.
62A-2-113.   License revocation -- Suspension.

(1)  If a license is revoked, the office may not grant a new license unless:

(a)  the human services program provides satisfactory evidence to the  office that the conditions upon which revocation was based have been corrected;

(b) the human services program is inspected by the office and found to be in compliance with all provisions of this chapter and applicable rules;

(c)  at least one year has passed since the day on which the licensee is served with final notice that the license is revoked; and

(d)  the office determines that the interests of the public will not be jeopardized by granting the license.

(2)  The office may suspend a license for no longer than one year.

(3)  When a license has been suspended, the office may restore, or restore subject to conditions, the suspended license upon a determination that the:

(a)  conditions upon which the suspension was based have been completely or partially corrected; and

(b)  interests of the public will not be jeopardized by restoration of the license.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2005 General Session

